hr-HR: Kontrola temperature: Podesiva temperatura; Unaprijed postavljena temperatura; Ostalo
sl-SI: Nadzor temperature: Nastavljiva temperatura; Prednastavljena temperatura; Drugo
fi: Lämpötilan säätö: Säädettävä lämpötila; Esiasetettu lämpötila; Muu
pt-BR: Controladores de temperatura: Temperatura ajustável; Temperatura predefinida; Outro
ro-RO: Controlul temperaturii: Temperatură reglabilă; Temperatura presetată; Altele
pt-PT: Controlo da temperatura: Temperatura ajustável; Temperatura predefinida; Outro
it: Controllo della temperatura: Temperatura regolabile; Temperatura preimpostata; Altro
nl: Temperatuurregeling: Instelbare temperatuur; Vooraf ingestelde temperatuur; Andere
bg-BG: Контрол на температурата: Регулируема температура; Предварително зададена температура; Други
cs: Ovládání teploty: Nastavitelná teplota; Přednastavená teplota; Jiné
tr: Sıcaklık Kontrolü: Ayarlanabilir sıcaklık; Önceden ayarlanmış sıcaklık; Diğer
de: Temperatursteuerung: Einstellbare Temperatur; Voreingestellte Temperatur; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 温度控制: 可调温度; 预设温度; 其他
zh-TW: 溫度控制: 溫度可調; 預設溫度; 其他
th: การควบคุมอุณหภูมิ: ปรับค่าอุณหภูมิได้; อุณหภูมิที่ตั้งไว้ล่วงหน้า; อื่นๆ
sv: Temperaturstyrning: Justerbar temperatur; Förinställd temperatur; Övrigt
vi: Điều khiển nhiệt độ: Điều chỉnh được nhiệt độ; Nhiệt độ cài sẵn; Khác
en: Temperature control: Adjustable temperature; Preset temperature; Other
lt-LT: Temperatūros reguliavimas: Reguliuojama temperatūra; Nustatyta temperatūra; Kita
ja: 温度制御: 温度調節可能; 温度設定; その他
nb: Temperaturkontroll: Regulerbar temperatur; Forhåndsinnstilt temperatur; Annet
ru: Регулировка температуры: Регулируемая температура; Предустановленная температура; Другое
da: Temperaturkontrol: Justerbar temperatur; Forudindstillet temperatur; Andet
es: Control de temperatura: Temperatura regulable; Temperatura preestablecida; Otros
hu: Hőmérséklet-szabályozás: Szabályozható hőmérséklet; Előre beállított hőmérséklet; Egyéb
pl: Regulacja temperatury: Regulowana temperatura; Zadana temperatura; Inne
ko: 온도 제어: 조절식 온도; 사전 설정된 온도; 기타
fr: Contrôle de la température: Température réglable; Température prédéfinie; Autre
sk-SK: Regulácia teploty: Nastaviteľná teplota; Prednastavená teplota; Iné
el: Έλεγχος θερμοκρασίας: Ρυθμιζόμενη θερμοκρασία; Προκαθορισμένη θερμοκρασία; Άλλο